apertium-kfy.kfy.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot[reg]
गाड़ा:गाड़ा   
सामान:सामान   #luggage/ item
सिक्का:सिक्का  #coin
शब्द:शब्द  #word
रिवाज:रिवाज  #tradition / ritual
विध्वा:विध्वा  #widow
विचार:विचार  #thought
शुरूवाद:शुरूवाद   #beginning
रिशता:रिशता   #relationship
रिश्ता:रिश्ता   #Dir/ LR
भाई:भाई   #brother
दगड़िया:दगड़िया   #friend
स्यैनि:स्यैनि    #woman
मोल:मोल #price
आज्ञा:आज्ञा   #command / permission
उज्याला:उज्याला #light
चिल्ला:चिल्ला   #scream
पश्चाताप:पश्चाताप   #remorse
चाल:चाल  #move / strategy
मजाक:मजाक  #joke
हालत:हालत  #condition / state
दर्शन:दर्शन  #visit
बरदान:बरदान  #blessing / gift / wish
मौका:मौका #opportunity / chance
दण्ड:दण्ड   #punishment / penalty
पश्चताप:पश्चताप  #regret
वाचा:वाचा  #agreement or contract
फैदा:फैदा #benifit
प्राण:प्राण   #life
उदारण:उदारण  #example / illustration
अपमान:अपमान    #insult
गवै:गवै   #Testimony
आशीष:आशीष   #blessing
आशा:आशा  #Dir/ LR
आश:आश #hope / expectation
गवाह:गवाह  #witness
गवाही:गवाही  #testimony
मन:मन   #mind
तरह:तरह    #manner / way
आगो:आगो  #Dir/LR
जरूरत:जरूरत     #need
प्रभु:प्रभु    #god
बखत:बखत     #time
मतलब:मतलब     #meaning / interpretation
जीवन:जीवन     #life
पड़ीना:पड़ीना  #affect/ influence
जीन्दगी:जीन्दगी   #life
शिक्षा:शिक्षा  #education
निन्दा:निन्दा  #criticism
चेलि:चेलि   #daughter
बैनि:बैनि  #sister
च्याला:च्याला  #son
विरोध:विरोध  #opposition / contradiction
बिरोध:बिरोध  #Dir/LR
भुकतान:भुकतान  #compensation
फरीसी:फरीसी  #parsi
उधार:उधार  #loan
चुक:चुक  #miss/ mistake
पड़ोसी:पड़ोसी  #neighbour
घात:घात  #injury, harm, damage
बर्ताव:बर्ताव   #behavior
सुधार:सुधार    #improvement
ब्यवहार:ब्यवहार   #behaviour 
अर्थ:अर्थ   #meaning / sense
ब्याल:ब्याल  #evening
बदला:बदला  #revenge
बिमार:बिमार   #person who is sick
मण्डली:मण्डली  #circle / group
शैतान:शैतान  #devil
शैताना:शैताना  #Dir/ LR
वादा:वादा  #promise
जेल:जेल  #jail
समझ:समझ  #understanding
दोष:दोष  #fault
बलिदान:बलिदान  #sacrifice
रस:रस  #juice
भेद:भेद  #secret / difference
बदल:बदल  #change
आँखा:आँखा #eye
दुश्मन:दुश्मन  #enemy
पुरखा:पुरखा  #forefather
किसान:किसान  #farmer
पहाड़:पहाड़  #hill / mountain
गुलाम:गुलाम  #slave
मित्र:मित्र  #friend
पापी<m>:पापी    #sinner
पापिन<f>:पापिन  #sinner
दिल:दिल  #heart
जाति:जाति  #race / caste
समुद्र:समुद्र   #sea
समुद्रा:समुद्रा  #Dir/ LR
तम्बू:तम्बू  #tent
सफर:सफर  #journey
परिवार:परिवार  #family
भि:भि  #ground
टापू:टापू  #island
नजर:नजर  #eyesight / sight
तलवार:तलवार  #sword
इच्छा:इच्छा   #wish
मूर्ति:मूर्ति  #statue / idol
मुहर:मुहर  #seal
ढूंगो:ढूंगो  #Dir / LR
ग्यूँ:ग्यूँ    #wheat
रोटो:रोटो    #Dir/LR
बनकाटो:बनकाटो     #axe
रूख:रूख     #tree
भखार:भखार     #barn
खोर:खोर  #head
खोरो:खोरो #head
कपाल:कपाल  #head/ temple
ढ़ुगा:ढ़ुगा    #stone
ढूंगा:ढूंगा    #Dir/LR
रोटा:रोटा     #roti
रवाटा:रवाटा  #roti
ख्वारा:ख्वारा  #head
संसार:संसार     #universe/world
संसारो:संसारो  #Dir/LR
दुनिया:दुनिया  #world
माछा:माछा     #fish
माँछा:माँछा   #Dir / LR
खत्ता:खत्ता  #bank account
लठ्ठा:लठ्ठा   #stick
स्याँप:स्याँप   #snake
अजगर:अजगर  #python
फाटक:फाटक   #gate
झील-झाल:झील-झाल   #thistle
कोढ़ी:कोढ़ी  #person suffering from Leprosy
सुबेदार:सुबेदार  #governor
सुबदार:सुबदार   #Dir/ LR
संदेश:संदेश  #message
मुर्गा:मुर्गा   #chicken
दास:दास   #servant
दावत:दावत   #feast
सियाल:सियाल    #lion
बसेरा:बसेरा   #nest
सिंहासन:सिंहासन   #throne
सिंहासना:सिंहासना  #Dir/ LR
लाश:लाश  #dead body
मुर्दा:मुर्दा   #dead person
लड़ाई:लड़ाई  #fight / battle
रोमी:रोमी   #roman
समाचार:समाचार   #news
सुसमाचार:सुसमाचार  #good news
सुसमाचारो:सुसमाचारो  #Dir/ LR
शिष्य:शिष्य #student
बातु:बातु  #fact
बाता:बाता   #Dir/LR
कान:कान  #ear
लोग:लोग   #people
लोगो:लोगो  #Dir/LR
लोगों:लोगों   #Dir/LR
विश्वासी:विश्वासी   #believer
अविश्वासी:अविश्वासी #non-believer
चिन:चिन   #sign/ indication
बगीच:बगीच   #garden
द्वार:द्वार  #door
जानवर:जानवर  #animal
इस्राएली:इस्राएली
इस्राएला:इस्राएला  #Dir/ LR
यहूदी:यहूदी
झील:झील  #lake
प्रार्थनान:प्रार्थनान   #Dir/ LR
खुटा:खुटा #leg
खुट:खुट  #Dir/LR
राज्यपाल:राज्यपाल  #Governor
तारा:तारा   #star
चीज:चीज   #thing
दाँत:दाँत  #teeth
शरीर:शरीर  #body
अंग:अंग  #organ
पिटींग:पिटींग    #insect which can fly
कीड़:कीड़  #insect
देश:देश    #country
प्रदेश:प्रदेश #state
घर:घर #home
जाग:जाग    #place 
शैहर:शैहर #city
कीड़ा:कीड़ा  #Dir/ LR
देशा:देशा    #Dir/ LR
प्रदेशा:प्रदेशा   #Dir/ LR
घरा:घरा   #Dir/ LR
जागा:जागा   #Dir/ LR 
शैहरा:शैहरा    #Dir/ LR
खाना:खाना    #food
पूर्वज:पूर्वज   #ancestor
कारण:कारण   #reason
सम्बन्ध:सम्बन्ध   #relation
सम्बध:सम्बध  #Dir/ LR
नदी:नदी    #river
बात:बात  #conversation/matter/fact
दिशा:दिशा #direction
प्रेरित:प्रेरित  #inspired
आदिमी:आदिमी   #man
स्वर्गदूत:स्वर्गदूत #angel
नियम:नियम #rule
शास्त्र:शास्त्र  #script
अधिकारी:अधिकारी #official
थैला:थैला #bag
थैल:थैल  #Dir/ LR
चेतावनी:चेतावनी #warning
जानकारी:जानकारी  #information
रात:रात  #night
सिपाई:सिपाई #soldier 
साल:साल  #year
आवाज:आवाज #voice
बालक:बालक  #male child
दिन:दिन  #day
रसम:रसम    #ritual
बाल:बाल    #hair
कपाड़ा:कपाड़ा    #cloth 
कपड़ा:कपड़ा   #cloth
पट्टा:पट्टा    #strap
ऊँट:ऊँट    #camel
सेवक:सेवक    #servant 
फसल:फसल    #crop
हात:हात    #hand
काम:काम    #work
सबूत:सबूत    #proof
दाना:दाना    #grain
किनार:किनार     #corner
बचन:बचन     #word
वचन:वचन  #word
कबूतर:कबूतर     #pigeon
नगर:नगर    #city
नगरा:नगरा   #Dir/ LR
मन्दिर:मन्दिर     #temple
फल:फल     #fruit
झीला:झीला     #lake
इलाका:इलाका	     #area
गोत्र:गोत्र     #lineage / clan
कुल:कुल  #lineage
बंश:बंश   #lineage
मार्ग:मार्ग     #route/ way
जमीन:जमीन #land
जाल:जाल     #net 
नाव:नाव  #boat
सभाघर:सभाघर  #meeting room
बिमारी:बिमारी  #disease
कमजोरी:कमजोरी  #weakness
दुख:दुख  #sorrow / pain
भूत:भूत   #ghost
आरोप:आरोप  #allegation
ईनाम:ईनाम  #prize
काम:काम  #work/ deeds
तारीफ:तारीफ  #praise/ compliment
हुकम:हुकम	  #command/ order
पत्र:पत्र  #letter
गाल:गाल  #cheek
बिचार:बिचार  #thought / idea
कुरता:कुरता  #a type of dress
कोट:कोट  #coat
किलोमीटर:किलोमीटर  #kilometer
कपटी:कपटी  #cheater/ fraud
कपटि:कपटि  #Dir/LR
गलि:गलि  #narrow lane
सड़क:सड़क  #road
मोड:मोड  #turn / bend
अपराधी:अपराधी  #criminal 
अपराध:अपराध  #crime
राज्य:राज्य  #a state (alternate meaning - to rule)
मुँख:मुँख  #face
तेल:तेल  #oil
चोर:चोर  #theif
मालिक:मालिक  #owner
मालिका:मालिका  #Dir/ LR
आकाश:आकाश  #sky
चिड़िया:चिड़िया  #bird
फुल:फुल  #flower
घास:घास   #grass
तिन्का:तिन्का   #husk
पाप:पाप   #sin
भेड़:भेड़   #sheep
भेड़िया:भेड़िया   #wolf
झाड़ि:झाड़ि   #bushes
अंगूर:अंगूर   #grapes
अंगूरो:अंगूरो  #Dir/ LR
अंजीर:अंजीर   #fig 
चट्‍टान:चट्‍टान  #rock
जवाब:जवाब   #answer/ reply
खतरा:खतरा  #danger/ risk/ threat
रेत:रेत   #sand
आत्मा:आत्मा   #soul
रोगी:रोगी  #person who are ill
राजा:राजा    #King
नाम:नाम    #name
वंश:वंश  #Lineage, dynasty
वंशज:वंशज   #decendent
देश:देश    #country
गौं:गौं  #village
गौंन:गौंन  #Dir/ LR
याजक:याजक #priest
वेदी:वेदी  #altar
मूसा:मूसा #savior
खुट्टा:खुट्टा #leg
खुट्ट:खुट्ट #Dir/LR
गन्धरस:गन्धरस #perfume
इत्र:इत्र   #perfume
बाटा:बाटा #route
बाट:बाट  #Dir/LR
बाँट:बाँट  #Dir/LR
बाटो:बाटो  #Dir/LR
बादल:बादल  #cloud
चर्चा:चर्चा   #discussion
तखलीफ:तखलीफ  #problem / trouble
कमरा:कमरा  #room
कटोर:कटोर   #bowl
थाली:थाली   #plate
मुसीबत:मुसीबत  #trouble
समुन्द्र:समुन्द्र   #sea/ ocean
बीज:बीज   #seed
सुंअर:सुंअर   #pig
भजन:भजन   #devotional song
बहस:बहस  #debate
दंगा:दंगा   #riot
झगाड़ा:झगाड़ा   #argument / fight
अनाज:अनाज  #grain
भाषा:भाषा #language
बच्चा:बच्चा  #Dir/ LR ---baby/ child
मजदूर:मजदूर    #laborer/ worker
ताल:ताल   #lake
बिपत्ति:बिपत्ति  #calamity/ misfortune
ताकत:ताकत   #strength/ power
डाकू:डाकू  #bandit or robber
झाड़ी:झाड़ी   #wild grass
छाती:छाती  #chest
गीत:गीत   #song
गान-बजाना:गान-बजाना  #song and music
गलति:गलति  #mistake
सन्तान:सन्तान  #offspring
औलाद:औलाद  #offspring
लहर:लहर   #waves
हफ्ता:हफ्ता   #week
प्राणि:प्राणि   #living being
पीढ़ी:पीढ़ी   #generation
दूत:दूत   #messenger
देवता:देवता   #god
कैदी:कैदी   #prisoners
कुआँ:कुआँ   #well
और:और  #offspring
हुकुम:हुकुम #order
कब्र:कब्र   #grave/ tomb
सन्दूक:सन्दूक   #trunk
सदस्य:सदस्य   #members
शिक्षक:शिक्षक   #teacher
बोट:बोट
मंत्री:मंत्री   #minister
मुन्सी:मुन्सी  #clerk
भाव:भाव   #emotion/ sentiment
ब्याह:ब्याह   #marriage/ wedding
ब्या:ब्या  #Dir/ LR
बजार:बजार   #market
नाना:नाना   #child
परदा:परदा    #curtain/ veil
पद:पद   #position/ rank
डबल:डबल
दीवार:दीवार   #wall 
हांगा:हांगा   #stem
घुणा:घुणा   #knee
घराना:घराना   #clan
घुड़:घुड़   #horse
मेज:मेज   #table
मुख:मुख   #face
